Utah statutes.
73-29-206.   Effect of chapter on other uses and restrictions -- Required acts.

(1)  Nothing in this chapter affects the right of the public to use public water for public recreational access, including the touching of the bed beneath the public water if:

(a)  the bed beneath the public water is public property; or

(b)  the bed beneath the public water is private property to which access is not restricted.

(2)  A person using a public water for public recreational access is subject to any other restriction lawfully placed on the use of the public water by a governmental entity with authority to restrict the use of the public water.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter limits or enlarges any right granted by express easement.

(4)  When leaving a public access area, a person shall remove any refuse or tangible personal property the person brought into the public access area.



Enacted by Chapter 410, 2010 General Session

